Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB934.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 525.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of harassing communications when[, with intent to intimidate,
harass, annoy, or alarm another person,] he or she:
(a) Sends repeated electronic or telephonic communications in a manner that is
reasonably likely to harass, annoy, alarm, torment, embarrass, or offend
another and serves no purpose of legitimate communication[Communicates
with a person, anonymously or otherwise, by telephone, telegraph, mail, or
any other form of electronic or written communication in a manner which
causes annoyance or alarm and serves no purpose of legitimate
communication];
(b) Publishes to social media or any internet website repeated electronic or
telephonic communications in a manner that is reasonably likely to cause
emotional distress, abuse, or torment to another person and serves no
purpose of legitimate communication[Makes a telephone call, whether or not
conversation ensues, with no purpose of legitimate communication]; or
(c) Communicates, while enrolled as a student in a local school district, with or
about another school student, anonymously or otherwise, by telephone, the
internet, telegraph, mail, or any other form of electronic or written
communication in a manner which a reasonable person under the
circumstances should know would cause the other student to suffer fear of
physical harm, intimidation, humiliation, or embarrassment and which serves
no purpose of legitimate communication.
(2) Harassing communications is a Class A[B] misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 5:15 PM Jacketed